Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 6. Fraud

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Landlord's fraud, deceptive trade practices and the like, in connection with mobile home owner's lease or rental of landsite, 39 ALR4th 859.

Liability of insurance agent or broker to insured for misrepresentation of cash surrender value or accumulated value benefits of life insurance policy, 44 ALR4th 1030.

Real-estate broker's liability to purchaser for misrepresentation or nondisclosure of physical defects in property sold, 46 ALR4th 546.

Criminal liability for theft of, interference with, or unauthorized use of, computer programs, files or systems, 51 ALR4th 971.

Criminal liability of pharmacy or pharmacist for welfare fraud in connection with supplying prescription drugs, 16 ALR5th 390.

Use of fraud or trick as “constructive breaking” for purpose of burglary or breaking and entering offense, 17 ALR5th 125.

Determination of loss caused by crime involving fraud or deceit, under United States sentencing guidelines § 2F1.1 (18 USC Appx), 118 ALR Fed 585.

§ 6-3-601.
“Writing” defined.

As used in this article “writing” means printing or any other method of recording information, money, coins, tokens, stamps, seals, credit cards, badges, trademarks, and other symbols of value, right, privilege or identification.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Applied

in

Hamburg v. State, 820 P.2d 523,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-602.
Forgery; penalties.

A person is guilty of forgery if, with intent to defraud, he:

Alters any writing of another without authority;

Makes, completes, executes, authenticates, issues or transfers any writing so that it purports to be the act of another who did not authorize that act, or to have been executed at a time or place or in a numbered sequence other than was in fact the case, or to be a copy of an original when no such original existed; or

Utters any writing which he knows to be forged in a manner specified in paragraphs (i) or (ii) of this subsection.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, forgery is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

Forgery is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the writing is a:

Permit required by W.S.

11-21-102

through

11-21-104

; or

Number or check number placed on a car or pit car in or about a mine.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2007, ch. 105, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “11-21-102” for “11-21-101” in (c)(i).

Elements of forgery.—

Defendant took steps to obtain a copy of the victim’s notary stamp and ensured that she had a current copy of the stamp when the original stamp expired, and she passed seven of the eight notarized applications as genuine and acted to keep her deception from being revealed; considering the evidence in the light most favorable to the State, it was sufficient to support a finding of intent to defraud. Bezold v. State, 2021 WY 124, 498 P.3d 73,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2021).

Legislative intent was to create two separate crimes, forgery and check fraud.

The forgery prohibition is against the making of a deceptive document per se, and that of the check fraud is against the making of a document having validity other than the fact that the funds against which it is drawn are “insufficient.” The defendant, who attempted to pass a check which was not genuine (i.e., it was signed by him under a fictitious name and was on a bank in which he did not have an account and in which there was no account under the fictitious name) was properly charged. Binger v. State, 712 P.2d 349,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1986).

Defendant properly charged with forgery and attempted forgery, not credit card fraud. —

See Alonso v. State, 712 P.2d 355,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 446

(Wyo. 1986).

Elements of forgery. —

Forgery requires that there be a false making or alteration of some instrument in writing, a fraudulent intent, and the instrument must be capable of effecting a fraud. Dixon v. Williams, 584 P.2d 1078,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1978).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-602(a)(ii) criminalizes conduct by which a transfer causes a writing to purport to be the act of another because this interpretation gives the word “transfer” the plain and ordinary meaning of “to print or otherwise copy from one surface to another by contact,” and further requires that the result of such transfer is that the writing purports to be the act of another. Riddle v. State, 2017 WY 153, 407 P.3d 392,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2017).

Making false instrument in name of fictitious person is forgery.

Moncref v. State, 33 Wyo. 192, 236 P. 1037,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1925).

As is false authorization to collect money. —

A false writing stating that one is authorized to collect money for a certain newspaper is forgery. Leslie v. State, 10 Wyo. 10, 65 P. 849,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1901), reh'g denied, 10 Wyo. 10, 69 P. 2,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1902).

Defendant committed crime of forgery by signing names of others on nomination petition.

Forgery is accomplished if the instrument is such that, if it were genuine, it would serve as the foundation for legal liability and has the potential to injure or defraud. In the case at hand, the electors of the state would have been defrauded and the election system of the state had the potential to be compromised by the defendant's actions. Hamburg v. State, 820 P.2d 523,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. Dec. 4, 1991).

Procedure. —

There was nothing improper about sustaining convenience store clerk's forgery conviction even though the amended information did not identify the specific transaction constituting the basis of the charge where, although the state could have charged her with 15 counts of forgery, each of which would support a forgery conviction, she was convicted of one count that embraced all 15 acts, and she neither cited authority that this was improper nor contended that she was not aware of the basis of the charge against her or that her ability to defend herself was in any way compromised. Howard v. State, 2002 WY 40, 42 P.3d 483,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2002).

No crime without fraudulent intent. —

Absent the required element of fraudulent intent, there is no crime or criminal activity established under this section. Dixon v. Williams, 584 P.2d 1078,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1978).

Intent to defraud may be inferred. —

The intent to defraud is to be inferred from the deliberate commission of a forgery. Thus, knowingly passing a forged instrument as genuine is conclusive of an intent to defraud. Evidence that the advantage which the instrument, if genuine, would have given has been obtained, or that the injury which such an instrument could inflict has been accomplished, sufficiently shows an intent to defraud. State v. Grider, 74 Wyo. 88, 284 P.2d 400 (Wyo.), reh'g denied, 74 Wyo. 111, 288 P.2d 766 (Wyo. 1955); Channel v. State, 592 P.2d 1145,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1979); Grable v. State, 649 P.2d 663,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1982), overruled in part, Vlahos v. State, 2003 WY 103, 75 P.3d 628,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2003).

Forgery inferred in wake of domestic dispute. —

The court reasonably inferred from the facts that the defendant wrote two contested checks without being authorized to do so by her estranged housemate, in the wake of a domestic dispute. Wetherelt v. State, 864 P.2d 449,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1993).

Not necessary to establish intent to defraud particular person or entity. —

Proof of an intent to prejudice, damage, or defraud anyone will satisfy the requirements of this section, and it is not necessary to establish intent to defraud a particular person or entity. The identity of the victim(s) is not an essential element of the crime. Thomas v. State, 667 P.2d 658,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1983).

Evidence sufficient to establish intent. —

The evidence was sufficient for the district court to draw the inference that defendant acted with the requisite specific intent to defraud the victim in cashing the victim's sales tax refund check, where he cashed the check contrary to the victim's specific directions, and kept for himself $250 more than the victim said she was going to give him. Schiefer v. State, 774 P.2d 133,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1989).

Evidence was sufficient to support a conviction as it was adequate for the jury to find that the defendant was the person who issued unauthorized checks and that she did so with the intent to defraud. Nollen v. State, 12 P.3d 682,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 2000).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction. —

Convenience store clerk committed forgery when she entered the victim's credit card numbers into a machine and printed out a receipt that purported to be a record of a sale of goods to the victim, where the record conclusively demonstrated the clerk knew the victim had not given his permission for the transaction; the fact that the clerk was not the one who signed the receipt did not alter the fact that it was the clerk who created the document and thereby committed forgery. Howard v. State, 2002 WY 40, 42 P.3d 483,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2002).

Although the State's handwriting expert testified that there were only “indications” that defendant had written the checks, other evidence was offered at trial that was sufficient to support defendant's conviction for check forgery, including that defendant was found in sole possession of the stolen checkbook, that she had a cash register receipt from the store where one of the forged checks was passed, and that she incorrectly spelled the victim's name when renting a room in the same manner in which the victim's name was misspelled on the check passed at the store. McGarvey v. State, 2002 WY 149, 55 P.3d 703,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2002).

Sufficient evidence was presented from which a jury could conclude beyond a reasonable doubt that defendant forged the signature on the vehicle's title without authority to do so and with intent to defraud where the owner, who was asked to provide title to his automobile as collateral to obtain a loan, testified that he searched his home and could not find the title. Although the defendant helped the owner look for the title and spoke to the bank loan officer, she did not reveal that she previously removed the title from his home, represented the signature on the back as being his and had it notarized without the owner's authority. Lapp v. State, 2004 WY 142, 100 P.3d 862,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2004).

Sufficient evidence supported defendant's forgery convictions under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-602

because his intent to defraud could be inferred from circumstantial evidence that showed he had the opportunity to steal girlfriend's stepfather's credit card; he admitted that he used the card and signed the stepfather's name; and his girlfriend said that he stole it despite her later recantation. The credibility of witnesses is the exclusive province of the trier of fact, and although defendant's testimony admittedly conflicted with that given by the stepfather and his wife, the jury obviously resolved the resulting credibility issues against defendant. Davis v. State, 2005 WY 93, 117 P.3d 454,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's forgery and theft convictions where the State presented the merchant copy of the receipts showing the alterations defendant made, the testimony of the customers confirming that their writing on the receipts had been altered, the restaurant's summary of sales showing that defendant was the server and the amount of the credit/debit card tip she was due was the amount inflated by the alteration, and labor reports showing that defendant signed off shortly after generating the report. Mraz v. State, 2016 WY 85, 378 P.3d 280,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2016).

Evidence insufficient to sustain conviction.

Trial court erred by denying defendant's motion for judgment of acquittal on the forgery charge because the evidence was insufficient to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that she acted with the intent to defraud by sending letters written on her employer's stationary to the Wyoming Department of Family Services advising that seven of her patients did not require substance abuse treatment even though she did not treat those patients at her employer's facility but rather treated them on her own time and in her own home. Defendant did not sign the name of “another” to her letters and no person was defrauded because the patients involved were counseled by defendant, that fundamental representation was in all respects true, and the employer could not have signed the letters because it could not qualify for the license to do so.
Ford v. State, 2011 WY 122, 259 P.3d 1178,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2011).

Offering opportunity to commit forgery no defense. —

Mere fact that a defrauded company offered the defendant the opportunity to commit the crime of forgery is not a defense. State v. Grider, 74 Wyo. 88, 284 P.2d 400 (Wyo.), reh'g denied, 74 Wyo. 111, 288 P.2d 766 (Wyo. 1955).

Information sufficient to charge offense. —

See State v. Grider, 74 Wyo. 88, 284 P.2d 400 (1955), rehearing denied, 74 Wyo. 111, 288 P.2d 766 (1955). See also, Leslie v. State, 10 Wyo. 10, 65 P. 849,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1901), reh'g denied, 10 Wyo. 10, 69 P. 2,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1902).

Proper to refuse special eyewitness-identification instructions. —

In a forgery case, although the defendant's theory of the case was that he was not the man who passed the check to the drive-in teller, the court's refusal of tendered “Model Special Instructions on Identification” was proper. General instructions on reasonable doubt and credibility were sufficient. Pearson v. State, 811 P.2d 704,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. June 14, 1991).

Evidence insufficient to sustain conviction. —

See Rowray v. Casper Mut. Bldg. & Loan Ass'n, 48 Wyo. 290, 45 P.2d 7,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1935).

Three-to-seven year sentence not improper under conflicting-penalty provision. —

Inasmuch as the defendant's sentence was three to seven years, the sentence was within “the lesser” of the penalties provided for the crime of forgery under the present Criminal Code and the crime of forgery as defined when the crime was committed in 1982. Accordingly, the argument that § 6-1-101(c) (conflicting penalties) made improper the sentence was without merit. Binger v. State, 712 P.2d 349,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1986).

Waiver of counsel. —

The record demonstrates that defendant knowingly waived his right to representation by the Public Defender and chose to represent himself, even though the inquiry by the court into the defendant's understanding of the issues may have been less than complete. Mapp v. State, 953 P.2d 140,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Newton v. State, 364 P.2d 993,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1961); Phillips v. State, 553 P.2d 1037,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1976).

Quoted

in

Mills v. Campbell County Canvassing Bd., 707 P.2d 747,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 588

(Wyo. 1985); Green v. State, 824 P.2d 1273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1992); Cross v. State, 2009 WY 154, 221 P.3d 972,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Dec. 17, 2009).

Stated

in

Rawson v. State, 900 P.2d 1136,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1995).

Evidence insufficient to sustain conviction.—

Defendant’s forgery conviction under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-602(a)(ii) was vacated because the plain meaning of the statutory term “transfer,” when interpreting the statute as a whole, meant causing a writing to purport to be the act of another, as interpreting the term to mean conveying from one person, place, or situation to another rendered “uttering,” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-602(a)(iii), redundant, and the State’s evidence did not show defendant’s “transfer” of a check resulted in the check’s purporting to be the act of another, as nothing showed defendant wrote the check, signed the check, or otherwise caused the check to be false. Riddle v. State, 2017 WY 153, 407 P.3d 392,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Santolini v. State, 6 Wyo. 110, 42 P. 746,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1895); Hutchins v. State, 483 P.2d 519,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1971); Parks v. State, 600 P.2d 1053,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 461

(Wyo. 1979); Sanderson v. State, 649 P.2d 677,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 372

(Wyo. 1982); City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Gezzi v. State, 800 P.2d 485,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1990); Reese v. State, 866 P.2d 82,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1993); Pearson v. State, 866 P.2d 1297,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1994); Black v. State, 869 P.2d 1137,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1994); Jibben v. State, 901 P.2d 1099,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1995); Bird v. Rozier, 948 P.2d 888,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1997); Sinning v. State, 2007 WY 193, 172 P.3d 388,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Dec. 11, 2007).

Jury instructions.—

Trial court
did not plainly err by failing to provide a supplemental jury instruction
after the jury asked for a definition of forgery where the elements
instructions given mirrored his section and the question did not
point
to any particular part of the instructions or elements that
was causing
them confusion. Mraz v. State, 2016 WY 85, 378 P.3d 280,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2016).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility, in forgery prosecution, of other acts of forgery, 34 ALR2d 777.

Forgery by use of fictitious or assumed name, 49 ALR2d 852.

Signing of credit charge or credit sales slip as forgery, 90 ALR2d 822.

Procuring signature by fraud as forgery, 11 ALR3d 1074.

Falsifying of money order as forgery, 65 ALR3d 1307.

Evidence of intent to defraud in state forgery prosecution, 108 ALR5th 593.

What constitutes forgery of signature of federal judge or of other officer of federal court, so as to violate 18 USC § 505, 71 ALR Fed 928.

§ 6-3-603.
Possession of forged writings and forgery devices; penalties.

A person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, if he:

Possesses a writing knowing it is forged in a manner specified in W.S. 6-3-602(a)(i) or (ii) and intending to utter or pass it to defraud another person;

With intent to commit forgery, makes or knowingly possesses a die, plate, apparatus, paper, metal, machine or other thing used to forge writings.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Evidence of intent to defraud in state forgery prosecution, 108 ALR5th 593.

§ 6-3-604.
Fraud against testamentary instruments and government records; penalties; “government record” defined.

A person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if he fraudulently steals, alters, defaces, destroys or secretes:

An executed will, codicil or other testamentary instrument; or

A part or all of a government record.

As used in this section, “government record” means a record, record book, docket or journal which is authorized by law or belongs or pertains to, or is filed with, a court of record, a circuit court or any governmental office or officer.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), deleted “a justice of the peace” following “court of record, a circuit court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Cross references. —

As to wills generally, see §§

2-6-101

through

2-6-306

.

As to public records generally, see §§

16-4-201

to

16-4-205

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes a public record or document within statute making falsification, forgery, mutilation, removal or other misuse thereof an offense, 75 ALR4th 1067.

What constitutes forgery of signature of federal judge or of other officer of federal court, so as to violate 18 USC § 505, 71 ALR Fed 928.

Government record.—

Evidence sufficient.—

Government record.—

Printed copy of an unsigned and unfiled bond form for defendant’s release which defendant altered to obtain more favorable terms of release qualified as a government record.
Mathewson v. State, 2018 WY 81, 431 P.3d 1121,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence sufficient.—

Based on the evidence provided by the State of Wyoming and the irrelevance of defendant’s actions after defendant made an alteration to the bond order form for defendant’s release, it was reasonable for the finder of fact to conclude that defendant had the requisite specific intent to act fraudulently to secure an advantage to which defendant was not entitled when defendant altered the form to change the conditions for defendant’s pretrial release so that defendant could pay a smaller fee to a bail bondsman and gain defendant’s release.
Mathewson v. State, 2018 WY 81, 431 P.3d 1121,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 6-3-605.
Operation of coin machine by slug or without required legal tender; manufacture or distribution of slugs; penalties; “slug” defined.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if knowingly and without authorization, he:

Operates a coin machine by use of a slug;

Obtains property or services from a coin machine without depositing the amount of legal tender required by the owner of the coin machine for the property or service.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if he manufactures or distributes slugs knowing or reasonably believing they will be used for fraudulent or unlawful purposes.

As used in this section, “slug” means an article or object which can be deposited in a coin machine as an improper substitute for a genuine coin, bill or token.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “coin machine,” see §

6-1-104

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-606.
Impersonation of a peace officer; penalties.

A person is guilty of impersonation of a peace officer if he falsely represents himself to be a peace officer with intent to compel action or inaction by any person against his will. Impersonation of a peace officer is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability for false personation during stop for traffic infraction, 26 ALR5th 378.

§ 6-3-607.
Defrauding creditors; penalties.

A mortgagor of property or a debtor who has given a security interest in property is guilty of defrauding creditors if he:

Transfers or conceals the property in derogation of the mortgagee’s or secured party’s interest with intent to deprive the mortgagee or secured party of his interest;

Removes the property from the jurisdiction of the district court of the county where the mortgage or security interest was given with intent to deprive the mortgagee or secured party of his interest and without obtaining the written consent of the mortgagee or secured party prior to the removal; or

Changes, alters, removes, substitutes, mutilates, covers up or defaces any brand, mark, number, name, letter, character, color or other characteristic used to identify the property with intent to deprive the mortgagee or secured party of his interest.

Defrauding creditors is:

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the mortgagee’s or secured party’s interest is of a value of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more; or

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 44, § 3.

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the mortgagee’s or secured party’s interest is of a value of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

The amount of the mortgagee’s or secured party’s interest involved in a violation of this section pursuant to a common scheme or the same transaction, whether from the same or a different mortgagee or secured party, may be aggregated in determining the value of the interest.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 126, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b)(i) and (iii), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00).”

Cross references. —

As to Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, see §

34-14-201

et seq.

As to Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, see §

34-14-210

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

False pretense or allied criminal fraud by partner with respect to partnership property, 43 ALR2d 1253.

Use of fictitious or assumed name, 49 ALR2d 852.

Admissibility of testimony of transferee as to his knowledge, purpose, intention or good faith on issue whether conveyance was in fraud of transferor's creditors, 52 ALR2d 418.

Evidence in prosecution for false pretense in obtaining money under promise of marriage, of similar attempts on other occasions, to establish fraudulent purpose or intent, 78 ALR2d 1359.

Procuring signature by fraud, 11 ALR3d 1074.

Rule denying recovery of property to one who conveyed to defraud creditors as applicable where the claim which motivated the conveyance was never established, 6 ALR4th 862.

Right of creditor to recover damages for conspiracy to defraud him of claim, 11 ALR4th 345.

Modern status of rule that crime of false pretenses cannot be predicated upon present intention not to comply with promise or statement as to future act, 19 ALR4th 959.

Elements and proof of crime of improper sale, removal, concealment or disposal of property subject to security interest under UCC, 48 ALR4th 819.

§ 6-3-608.
Fraudulent use of materials; fraudulent obtaining of money by contractor; penalties.

A contractor or subcontractor who purchases materials on credit and represents that they will be used in a designated building or improvement and who knowingly and with intent to defraud the seller uses the materials or allows them to be used in a building or improvement other than the one designated is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

Any contractor who receives money from an owner and provides the owner with an affidavit that all materialmen and subcontractors have been paid when he knows all materialmen and subcontractors have not been paid is guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced to not more than five (5) years in the penitentiary, fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both. Lien waivers signed by all materialmen, subcontractors and laborers are prima facie evidence that monies received from the owner were applied toward construction costs by the contractor.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Quoted

in

Miller v. State, 732 P.2d 1054,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 395

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-609.
Sports bribery; definitions; penalties; venue; bonuses not prohibited.

As used in this section:

“Athletic contest” means a sports event for which an admission fee is charged or in which the participants or officials are compensated;

“Bribe” means to confer a direct or indirect gift, emolument, money, thing of value, testimonial, privilege, appointment or personal advantage;

“Official” means a referee, manager, umpire, coach or other official of an athletic club, team, league, association, institution or conference;

“Participant” means a player in an athletic contest.

A person is guilty of sports bribery if:

He bribes or offers to bribe a participant or official in an athletic contest with the intent to:

Induce a participant to lose or limit the margin of victory or defeat;

Influence an official’s decision, opinion or judgment for the purpose of losing or limiting the margin of victory or defeat.

He is a participant or official in an athletic contest and he:

Accepts or agrees to accept a bribe given with the intentions proscribed in paragraph (i) of this subsection; or

Commits a knowing act of omission or commission with intent to lose or limit the margin of victory or defeat for the purpose of material gain to himself.

Sports bribery is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

To convict a person for violating this section it is not necessary that the participant or official be employed, appointed or selected at the time the bribe is conferred, offered or accepted, or that the participant or official actually play or participate.

In prosecutions under this section, venue may be laid in the county where:

The bribe was given, offered or accepted;

The athletic contest occurred; or

The acts referred to in this section were committed.

Nothing in this section prohibits the giving or offering of a bonus or extra compensation to a participant or official to encourage a higher degree of skill, ability or diligence in the performance of his duties.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to bribery generally, see §

6-5-102

et seq.

As to bribery of horse racing officials, see § 11-25-109(a).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Bribery in athletic contests, 49 ALR2d 1234.

Venue in bribery cases where crime is committed partly in one county and partly in another, 11 ALR4th 704.

Recovery in tort for wrongful interference with chance to win game, sporting event or contest, 85 ALR4th 1048.

§ 6-3-610.
Mislabeling merchandise; penalty.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) if, with intent to promote the purchase or sale of a commodity, he knowingly brands, labels, stamps or marks the commodity in a false, misleading or deceptive manner.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to misbranding foods and drugs, see §

35-7-111

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-3-611.
False, misleading or deceptive advertising; penalty.

A person who disseminates to the public an advertisement which he knows is false, misleading or deceptive, with intent to promote the purchase or sale of property or the acceptance of employment, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to when advertising is an unlawful trade practice under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act, see §

40-12-105

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes false, misleading or deceptive advertising subject to action by Federal Trade Commission, 65 ALR2d 225, 34 ALR Fed 507.

Reward for disproving commercial claim, 96 ALR3d 907.

Actionable nature of advertising impugning quality or worth of merchandise or products, 42 ALR4th 318.

§ 6-3-612.
False written statements to obtain property or credit; penalties.

A person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or the amount of the credit sought or obtained, whichever is greater, or by both fine and imprisonment, if he knowingly makes or uses a false written statement of the financial condition of himself or another person with intent that the statement be relied upon to procure the delivery of property, the payment of cash, the making of a loan, the extension of credit, the discount of an account receivable or the making, acceptance, discount, sale or endorsement of a bill of exchange or promissory note for the benefit of himself or another person.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or the amount of the credit sought or obtained, whichever is greater, or by both fine and imprisonment, if he knowingly makes or uses a false written statement to a pawnbroker with respect to the ownership of property with intent that the statement be relied upon to procure from the pawnbroker the payment of cash, the making of a loan, the extension of credit or the discount of an account receivable for the benefit of himself or another person.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1997, ch. 26, § 1; 1998, ch. 15, § 1.

Applied

in

Hildebrand v. State, 491 P.2d 741,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

False statement as to existing encumbrance on chattel in obtaining loan or credit as criminal false pretense, 53 ALR2d 1215.

Criminal liability under state laws in connection with application for, or receipt of, public welfare payments, 22 ALR4th 534.

§ 6-3-613.
False representations of value of shares, bonds or property; penalties.

A person who knowingly and with intent to defraud makes or publishes, or permits to be made or published, any publication of or concerning the affairs, financial condition or property of a person which contains a statement which is false, exaggerated, or intended to give a less or greater value to the shares, bonds or property of the person than the shares, bonds or property in fact possess is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

For general corporation laws, see title 17.

Reliance not element of crime. —

Former §

6-3-105

made no mention of reliance as an element of the crime; there was no requirement under former §

6-3-105

to prove that a specific victim relied upon the defendant's financial statements before he could be convicted. Smith v. State, 721 P.2d 1088,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 591

(Wyo. 1986).

Evidence was sufficient for conviction of the defendant under former §

6-3-105

,

where, from testimony and reasonable inferences that might be drawn from it, the jury could have concluded that claimed payments for the purchase of land and preconstruction expenses were never made and, because the payments were not made, entries on financial statements gave greater apparent value to property held than actually existed. Smith v. State, 721 P.2d 1088,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 591

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility to establish fraudulent purpose or intent, in prosecution for obtaining or attempting to obtain money or property by false pretenses, of evidence of similar attempts on other occasions, 78 ALR2d 1359.

Admissibility, in prosecution for obtaining money or property by fraud or false pretenses, of evidence of subsequent payments made by defendant to victim, 10 ALR3d 572.